Missouri, session 2026, HB1897.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 195, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 195.778, to read as follows:
195.778. 1. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Applicant", an applicant for a license;
(2) "License", a comprehensive marijuana cultivation facility license,
comprehensive marijuana dispensary facility license, or comprehensive marijuana-
infused products manufacturing facility license, as described in Article XIV, Section 2 of
the Constitution of Missouri;
(3) "Minimum standards", the minimum standards required to receive a license
that are consistent with the provisions of Article XIV, Section 2 of the Constitution of
Missouri.
2. Due to the demand for marijuana in this state and consistent with its
obligation to lift or ease any limit on the number of licenses in order to meet such
demand as described in Article XIV, Section 2, Subsection 4, Subdivision (2) of the
Constitution of Missouri, the department of health and senior services shall issue a
license to any applicant who meets minimum standards for the license for which the
applicant applies.
3. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 2 of this section to the contrary,
the department of health and senior services may deny a license to an applicant who
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1897 2
meets minimum standards for the license for which the applicant applies in order to
comply with the ten percent cap for ownership of licenses established in Article XIV,
Section 2, Subsection 4, Subdivisions (9), (10), and (11) of the Constitution of Missouri.
4. The general assembly hereby abrogates any limits on the number of licenses
established in regulations.
✔